Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2311
State funds; State Treasurer; failure to act; penalty.

If the State Treasurer shall willfully fail or refuse at any time to do or perform any act required of him by sections 77-2301 to 77-2309, he shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor. It shall be the duty of the Attorney General to enter and prosecute to final determination all suits for the recovery of any penalty arising under the conditions of any bond required to be given by the provisions of sections 77-2303 to 77-2305.

Laws 1891, c. 50, § 5, p. 351;

R.S.1913, § 6659;

C.S.1922, § 6190;

C.S.1929, § 77-2505;

R.S.1943, § 77-2311;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 231.